Alaska statutes. Title 15. Elections.
Article 1. Absentee Voting.
Sec. 15.20.207.
Procedure for district questioned ballot review.

The district questioned ballot counting board shall examine each questioned ballot envelope and shall determine whether the questioned voter is qualified to vote at the election and whether the questioned ballot has been properly cast.

A questioned ballot may not be counted if the voter

has failed to properly execute the certificate;

is a first-time voter who initially registered by mail or by facsimile or other electronic transmission approved by the director under AS

15.07.050

, has not provided the identification required by AS

15.15.225(a)

, was not eligible for waiver of the identification requirement under AS

15.15.225(b)

, and has not provided the identifiers required in AS

15.07.060(a)(2)

and (3) that can be verified through state agency records described in AS

15.07.055(e)

; or

is a voter other than one described in (2) of this subsection, did not provide identification described in AS

15.15.225(a)

, was not personally known by the election official, and has not provided the identifiers required in AS

15.07.060(a)(2)

and (3).

Any person present at the district questioned ballot review may challenge the name of a questioned voter when read from the voter’s certificate on the envelope if the person has good reason to suspect that the questioned voter is not qualified to vote, is disqualified, or has voted at the same election. The person making the challenge shall specify the basis of the challenge in writing. The district questioned ballot counting board by majority vote may refuse to accept and count the questioned ballot of a person properly challenged under grounds listed in (b) of this section.

The election supervisor shall place all rejected questioned ballots in a separate envelope with statements of challenge. The envelope shall be labeled “rejected questioned ballots” and shall be forwarded to the director with the election certificates and other returns.

If a questioned ballot is not rejected, the envelope shall be opened and the secrecy sleeve containing the questioned ballot shall be placed in a container and mixed with other secrecy sleeves containing questioned ballots.

The secrecy sleeves shall be drawn from the container, the questioned ballots shall be removed from the secrecy sleeves, and the questioned ballots counted at the times specified in AS

15.20.205

and according to the rules for determining properly marked ballots in AS

15.15.360

.

Upon completion of the questioned ballot review, the election supervisor shall prepare an election certificate for execution by the district questioned ballot counting board, and shall forward the original certificate and returns to the director as soon as the count is completed but no later than the 16th day following the election.

The director shall prepare and mail to each questioned voter whose questioned ballot was rejected under this section a summary of the reason that the challenge to the questioned ballot was upheld and the questioned ballot was rejected.

The director shall mail the materials described in (h) of this section to the voter not later than

10 days after completion of the review of ballots by the state review board for a primary election or a special primary election under AS

15.40.140

;

60 days after certification of the results of a general or special election, other than a special primary election described in (1) of this subsection.

In addition to mailing the materials under (i)(1) of this section, for a questioned voter whose questioned primary election ballot was rejected, not later than the deadline set out in (i)(1) of this section, the director shall

determine whether, from the information obtained under AS

15.07.070(h)

, the voter’s name may be entered on the voter registration list;

if the voter is eligible, register the voter in accordance with the information submitted by the voter under AS

15.07.070(h)

; and

confirm or deny the registration by written notice mailed to the voter.

The director shall make available through a free access system to each voter voting a questioned ballot a system to check to see whether the voter’s ballot was counted and, if not counted, the reason why the ballot was not counted. The director shall make this information available through the free access system not less than

10 days after certification of the results of a primary election or a special primary election under AS

15.40.140

; and

30 days after certification of the results of a general or special election, other than a special primary election described in (1) of this subsection.

History.

(§ 90 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 19 ch 85 SLA 1986; am §§ 33 — 38 ch 86 SLA 1996; am § 2 ch 12 SLA 2001; am § 3 ch 20 SLA 2002; am §§ 20, 21 ch 113 SLA 2003; am §§ 18, 19 ch 73 SLA 2013; §§ 33 and 34, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2)

Administrative Code. —

For absentee and questioned voting, see 6 AAC 25, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective January 1, 2014, in (i)(1), added “, or for a special election under AS

15.40.140

that is followed by a special runoff election” following “primary election”, in (i)(2), added “, other than a special election described in (1) of this subsection” following “special election”; in (k), added the (1) and (2) designations; in (k)(1), added “, or a special election under AS

15.40.140

that is followed by a special runoff election;” following “primary election”, rewrote (k)(2), which read “not less than 30 days after the certification of the results of a general or special election”.

The 2020 amendment, effective February 28, 2021, in (i)(1), substituted “or a special primary election under AS

15.40.140

” for “, or for a special election under AS

15.40.140

that is followed by a special runoff election”, in (i)(2), substituted “special primary election” for the second occurrence of “special election”; in (k)(1), substituted “or a special primary election under AS 15,40.140” for “, or a special election under AS 15.40.140 that is followed by a special runoff election”, in (k)(2), deleted “the” preceding “certification” and substituted “special primary election” for the second occurrence of “special election”.

Sec. 15.20.210.
Procedure for district canvass. [Repealed, § 231 ch 100 SLA 1980. For current law, see AS 15.20.203.]

Sec. 15.20.211.
Counting cross-district and certain write-in votes.

If a qualified voter of the state votes a ballot for a house district other than the house district in which the voter is registered, that person may vote only for

statewide ballot measures and questions;

candidates for federal or statewide offices;

candidates for the state senate if the voter’s former residence and present residence are in the same senate district; and

candidates for judicial retention if the voter’s former residence and present residence are in the same judicial district.

If a voter requested an absentee ballot and the proper absentee ballot was not sent to the voter, the votes cast by the voter on the ballot received which are for write-in candidates the voter could have voted for if the voter had received and voted the proper absentee ballot shall be counted.

The director shall prepare and mail to each voter whose ballot was subject to partial counting under this section a summary of the reason that the challenge to the ballot was upheld and the ballot was subject to only a partial counting.

The director shall mail the materials described in (c) of this section to the voter not later than

10 days after completion of the review of ballots by the state review board for a primary election or a special primary election under AS

15.40.140

;

60 days after certification of the results of a general or special election, other than a special primary election described in (1) of this subsection.

In addition to mailing the materials under (d)(1) of this section, for a questioned voter whose questioned primary election ballot was partially counted, not later than the deadline set out in (d)(1) of this section, the director shall

determine whether, from the information obtained under AS

15.07.070(h)

, the voter’s name may be entered on the voter registration list;

if the voter is eligible, register the voter in accordance with the information submitted by the voter under AS

15.07.070(h)

; and

confirm or deny the registration by written notice mailed to the voter.

The director shall make available through a free access system to each voter whose ballot was subject to partial counting under this section a system to check to see whether the voter’s ballot was partially counted and, if not counted, the reason why the ballot was not counted. The director shall make this information available through the free access system not less than

10 days after certification of the results of a primary election or a special primary election under AS

15.40.140

; and

30 days after certification of the results of a general or special election, other than a special primary election described in (1) of this subsection.

History.

(§ 91 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 8 ch 9 SLA 1996; am § 39 ch 86 SLA 1996; am § 47 ch 21 SLA 2000; am § 54 ch 82 SLA 2000; am § 22 ch 113 SLA 2003; am §§ 20, 21 ch 73 SLA 2013; §§ 35 and 36, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2)

Administrative Code. —

For absentee and questioned voting, see 6 AAC 25, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective January 1, 2014, in (d)(1), added “, or for a special election under AS

15.40.140

that is followed by a special runoff election” following “primary election”, in (d)(2), added “, other than a special election described in (1) of this subsection” following “special election”; in (f), added the (1) and (2) designations; in (f)(1), added “, or a special election under AS

15.40.140

that is followed by a special runoff election;” following “primary election”, rewrote (f)(2), which read “not less than 30 days after the certification of the results of a general or special election”.

The 2020 amendment, effective February 28, 2021, in (d)(1), substituted “or a special primary election under AS

15.40.140

” for “, or for a special election under AS

15.40.140

that is followed by a special runoff election”, in (d)(2), substituted “special primary election” for the second occurrence of “special election”; in (f)(1), substituted “or a special primary election under AS 15,40.140” for “, or a special election under AS 15.40.140 that is followed by a special runoff election”, in (f)(2), deleted “the” preceding “certification” and substituted “special primary election” for the second occurrence of “special election”.

Sec. 15.20.220.
Procedure for state review.

When the director and appointed party representatives have completed the review of ballots cast at the voting precincts, they shall proceed to review the absentee and questioned ballot votes certified by the district counting boards. The review of the absentee and questioned ballot vote certified by the district counting boards shall be accomplished by reviewing the tallies of the recorded vote to check for mathematical error and by comparing the totals with the election certificate of results.

The state review board shall review and count absentee ballots under AS

15.20.081(e)

and (h) and questioned ballots that have been forwarded to the director and that have not been reviewed or counted by a district counting board.

History.

(§ 37 ch 59 SLA 1982; am § 12 ch 67 SLA 1989)

Sec. 15.20.225.
Definition of “state election”.

In AS

15.20.010

—

15.20.225

, “state election” means a primary, general, or special election a purpose of which is to

select, nominate, or elect a governor, a lieutenant governor, an acting governor, a state senator, or a state representative;

select, nominate, or elect delegates to a constitutional convention;

approve or reject an initiative submitted under art. XI, Constitution of the State of Alaska, and AS

15.45.190

—

15.45.200

or a referendum submitted under art. XI, Constitution of the State of Alaska, and AS

15.45.420

—

15.45.440

;

recall an official identified in (1) of this section when authorized by art. XI, Constitution of the State of Alaska, and AS

15.45.650

—

15.45.690

;

approve or reject a proposed constitutional amendment submitted under AS 15.50; or

ratify or reject a state general obligation bond when authorized by AS 37.15.

History.

(§ 9 ch 9 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For absentee and questioned voting, see 6 AAC 25, art. 3.

Secs. 15.20.230 — 15.20.420.
Voting machines. [Repealed, § 231 ch 100 SLA 1980.]